Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3424
Right to make health care decisions; sections; effect.

Subject to subsection (5) of section 30-3417 and subsection (7) of section 30-3420, in the absence of an effective designation of power of attorney for health care nothing in sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 shall affect any right a person may otherwise have to make health care decisions on behalf of another.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 28.